Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-503
Nature of protected series.

A protected series of a series limited liability company is a person distinct from:

(1) the company, subject to subsection (c) of section 21-504, subdivision (1) of section 21-524, and subsection (d) of section 21-525;

(2) another protected series of the company;

(3) a member of the company, whether or not the member is an associated member of the protected series;

(4) a protected-series transferee of a protected series of the company; and

(5) a transferee of a transferable interest of the company.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 4.